Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.300

Corporal punishment prohibited—Adoption of policy.

The use of corporal punishment in the common schools is prohibited. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and adopt a policy prohibiting the use of corporal punishment in the common schools. The policy shall be adopted and implemented in all school districts.

[ 2006 c 263 s 702; 1993 c 68 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.